Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5408
Supplemental provisions.

The provisions of the Vacant Property Registration Act shall be supplemental and in addition to any other laws of the State of Nebraska relating to vacant property.

Laws 2018, LB256, § 8.